Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.310

Legislative—Initiative—Notice of election.

The city clerk shall cause any ordinance or proposition required to be submitted to the voters at an election to be published once in each of the daily newspapers in the city not less than five nor more than twenty days before the election, or if no daily newspaper is published in the city, publication shall be made in each of the weekly newspapers published therein. This publication shall be in addition to the notice required in RCW 29A.52.355.

[ 2015 c 53 s 30; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.310. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]